Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 4. LIABILITY IN TORT

CHAPTER 92. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY FOR PERSON ASSISTING CERTAIN ANIMALS

Sec. 92.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Animal control agency" means a municipal or county animal control office, or a state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency, that collects, impounds, or keeps stray, homeless, abandoned, or unwanted animals.

(2) "Livestock animal" means an equine animal or an animal raised primarily for use as food for human consumption or to produce fiber for human use and includes horses, cattle, sheep, swine, goats, and poultry.

(3) "Nonlivestock animal" means a service animal or an animal maintained as a pet in the home or on the property of the animal's owner and includes captured wildlife or an exotic animal maintained as a pet. The term does not include a livestock animal.

(4) "Running at large" means not under the control of the owner or handler while:

(A) on the premises of another without the consent of the owner of the premises or any other person authorized to give consent; or

(B) on a highway, a public road or street, or any other place open to the public generally.

(5) "Service animal" has the meaning assigned by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Section 12101 et seq.).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 530 (H.B. 2471), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 92.002. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY. (a) In this section, "emergency" includes:

(1) a natural disaster, including an earthquake, fire, flood, or storm;

(2) a hazardous chemical or substance incident; and

(3) a vehicular collision with an animal or other transportation accident in which an animal is injured or is otherwise in need of assistance to protect the animal's health or life.

(b) A person who in good faith and without compensation renders or obtains medical care or treatment for a nonlivestock animal that is injured or in distress because of an emergency, abandoned, running at large, or stray is not liable for civil damages for an injury to the animal resulting from an act or omission in rendering or obtaining the medical care or treatment, unless the person commits gross negligence, if:

(1) the person first takes reasonable steps to locate the animal's owner by:

(A) attempting to contact the animal's owner using the contact information located on the animal's identification tag, collar, or chip, if any, or taking other reasonable action to contact the owner; or

(B) notifying an animal control agency with authority over the area where the person resides, or an animal control agency with authority over the area where the person took custody of the animal if that area lies outside of the municipality or county where the person resides, that the animal is in the person's custody and providing the animal control agency with the person's contact information; or

(2) a veterinarian determines that the animal:

(A) needs immediate medical treatment to alleviate pain or save the animal's life; or

(B) exhibits visible signs of recent abuse as described by Section 42.092(b), Penal Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 530 (H.B. 2471), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 92.003. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY FOR ANIMAL CONTROL AGENCIES AND CERTAIN EMPLOYEES. An animal control agency or an employee of an animal control agency acting within the scope of the person's employment that in good faith takes into custody and cares for a nonlivestock animal that is abandoned, running at large, or stray is not liable for civil damages for an injury to the animal arising from an act or omission in caring for the animal, except in a case of gross negligence, if the animal control agency obtains custody of the animal from a person not affiliated with the animal control agency and that person certifies in writing that the person has taken reasonable steps to locate the owner as provided by Section 92.002.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 530 (H.B. 2471), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 92.004. EFFECT ON OTHER LAW. (a) This chapter does not limit the application of or supersede Section 822.013, Health and Safety Code, or Section 801.358, Occupations Code.

(b) This chapter does not create any civil liability or waive any defense, immunity, or jurisdictional bar available under state law.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 530 (H.B. 2471), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.